Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3429
Open Meetings Act; local team not considered public body; information and records; confidentiality.

(1) A local team shall not be considered a public body for purposes of the Open Meetings Act.

(2) Except for reports under section 71-3427, information and records acquired or created by a local team are not public records subject to disclosure pursuant to sections 84-712 to 84-712.09, shall be confidential, shall not be subject to subpoena, shall be privileged and inadmissible in evidence in any legal proceeding of any kind or character, and shall not be disclosed to any other department or agency of the State of Nebraska, except the Department of Health and Human Services as specified in the Overdose Fatality Review Teams Act.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 86.

Open Meetings Act, see section 84-1407.